Illinois, session 104th, SB90.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 5changing Section 10.05 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/10.05)  (from Ch. 15, par. 210.05)7    Sec. 10.05. Deductions from warrants; statement of reason 8for deduction. Whenever any person shall be entitled to a 9warrant or other payment from the treasury or other funds held 10by the State Treasurer, on any account, against whom there 11shall be any then due and payable account or claim in favor of 12the State, the United States upon certification by the 13Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, or his or her 14delegate, pursuant to a reciprocal offset agreement under 15subsection (i-1) of Section 10 of the Illinois State 16Collection Act of 1986, or a unit of local government, a school 17district, a public institution of higher education, as defined 18in Section 1 of the Board of Higher Education Act, a public 19agency or association organized under an intergovernmental 20agreement in accordance with the provisions of the 21Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, including an 22intergovernmental risk management association or 23self-insurance pool, or the clerk of a circuit court, upon   SB0090 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06245 SPS 16280 b1certification by that entity, the Comptroller, upon 2notification thereof, shall ascertain the amount due and 3payable to the State, the United States, the unit of local 4government, the school district, the public institution of 5higher education, the public agency or association organized 6under an intergovernmental agreement in accordance with the 7provisions of the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, or the 8clerk of the circuit court, as aforesaid, and draw a warrant on 9the treasury or on other funds held by the State Treasurer, 10stating the amount for which the party was entitled to a 11warrant or other payment, the amount deducted therefrom, and 12on what account, and directing the payment of the balance; 13which warrant or payment as so drawn shall be entered on the 14books of the Treasurer, and such balance only shall be paid. 15The Comptroller may deduct any one or more of the following: 16(i) the entire amount due and payable to the State or a portion 17of the amount due and payable to the State in accordance with 18the request of the notifying agency; (ii) the entire amount 19due and payable to the United States or a portion of the amount 20due and payable to the United States in accordance with a 21reciprocal offset agreement under subsection (i-1) of Section 2210 of the Illinois State Collection Act of 1986; or (iii) the 23entire amount due and payable to the unit of local government, 24the school district, the public institution of higher 25education, the public agency or association organized under an 26intergovernmental agreement in accordance with the provisions   SB0090 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06245 SPS 16280 b1of the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, or the clerk of the 2circuit court, or a portion of the amount due and payable to 3that entity, in accordance with an intergovernmental agreement 4authorized under this Section and Section 10.05d. No request 5from a notifying agency, the Secretary of the Treasury of the 6United States, a unit of local government, a school district, 7a public institution of higher education, a public agency or 8association organized under an intergovernmental agreement in 9accordance with the provisions of the Intergovernmental 10Cooperation Act, or the clerk of a circuit court for an amount 11to be deducted under this Section from a wage or salary 12payment, from a contractual payment to an individual for 13personal services, or from pension annuity payments made under 14the Illinois Pension Code shall exceed 25% of the net amount of 15such payment. "Net amount" means that part of the earnings of 16an individual remaining after deduction of any amounts 17required by law to be withheld. For purposes of this 18provision, wage, salary or other payments for personal 19services shall not include final compensation payments for the 20value of accrued vacation, overtime or sick leave. Whenever 21the Comptroller draws a warrant or makes a payment involving a 22deduction ordered under this Section, the Comptroller shall 23notify the payee and the State agency that submitted the 24voucher of the reason for the deduction and he or she shall 25retain a record of such statement in his or her records. As 26used in this Section, an "account or claim in favor of the   SB0090 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06245 SPS 16280 b1State" includes all amounts owing to "State agencies" as 2defined in Section 7 of this Act. However, the Comptroller 3shall not be required to accept accounts or claims owing to 4funds not held by the State Treasurer, where such accounts or 5claims do not exceed $50, nor shall the Comptroller deduct 6from funds held by the State Treasurer under the Senior 7Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act 8or for payments to institutions from the Illinois Prepaid 9Tuition Trust Fund (unless the Trust Fund moneys are used for 10child support). The Comptroller shall not deduct from payments 11to be disbursed from the Child Support Enforcement Trust Fund 12as provided for under Section 12-10.2 of the Illinois Public 13Aid Code, except for payments representing interest on child 14support obligations under Section 10-16.5 of that Code. The 15Comptroller and the Department of Revenue shall enter into an 16interagency agreement to establish responsibilities, duties, 17and procedures relating to deductions from lottery prizes 18awarded under Section 20.1 of the Illinois Lottery Law. The 19Comptroller may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with 20the Department of Revenue and the Secretary of the Treasury of 21the United States, or his or her delegate, to establish 22responsibilities, duties, and procedures relating to 23reciprocal offset of delinquent State and federal obligations 24pursuant to subsection (i-1) of Section 10 of the Illinois 25State Collection Act of 1986. The Comptroller may enter into 26intergovernmental agreements with a any unit of local   SB0090 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06245 SPS 16280 b1government, a school district, a public institution of higher 2education, a public agency or association organized under an 3intergovernmental agreement in accordance with the provisions 4of the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, or the clerk of a 5circuit court to establish responsibilities, duties, and 6procedures to provide for the offset, by the Comptroller, of 7obligations owed to those entities. A request for a deduction 8by a public agency or association organized under an 9intergovernmental agreement in accordance with the provisions 10of the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act shall be accompanied 11by a written agreement between the 2 parties or a court order 12to that effect. 13    For the purposes of this Section, "clerk of a circuit 14court" means the clerk of a circuit court in any county in the 15State. 16(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 100-763, eff. 8-10-18.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182026.